cv_RU/cv_RU.dic
ҫӑпала/A
ҫатан/A
ҫурӑм/A
ҫыхӑ/A
ӑман/A
ӑнлану/A
ӑрасналӑх/A
ӑслӑлӑхҫӑ/A
ӑсчах/A
Абрам/A
Азнакай/A
Аким/A
Александрович/A
Альтаир/A
Андриан/A
Аппак/A
Арктур/A
Архипович/A
Ахмать/A
Бальмер/A
Белорецк/A
Богданович/A
Бриллюэн/A
Вайулла/A
Васильевич/A
Вентспилс/A
Висконсин/A
Волгоград/A
Вюрцбург/A
Геленджик/A
Гильберт/A
Гринпис/A
Дакар/A
Дербент/A
Дмитров/A
Евграф/A
Ентиха/A
Ефимович/A
Занзибар/A
Иванов/A
Илентюк/A
Ильмайӑр/A
Индианаполис/A
Ирккун/A
Исфахан/A
Кӑсӑк/A
Кабул/A
Камышин/A
Карпович/A
Кейптаун/A
Клапейрон/A
Копейск/A
Крит/A
Куракка/A
Лежандр/A
Лимож/A
Львович/A
Мӑхамат/A
Макӑл/A
Маркс/A
Маюр/A
Микуҫ/A
Минтӑкӑл/A
Мирушка/A
Мичуринск/A
Мулантай/A
Наҫук/A
Непал/A
Никифорович/A
Ноябрьск/A
Няхха/A
Орск/A
Павӑл/A
Пайпулат/A
Пантелеймон/A
Пейсулла/A
Петрушков/A
Пимӑрса/A
Питпулат/A
Пласса/A
Прокопьев/A
Расыйа/A
Родионович/A
Сӑливан/A
Савнеслу/A
Салтиван/A
Саратов/A
Сахман/A
Североуральск/A
Серентюк/A
Сетрухха/A
Сильтук/A
Сита/A
Соломон/A
Стокгольм/A
Тӑхтаман/A
Танжер/A
Терентьевич/A
Тимун/A
Тринидад/A
Туканаш/A
Тусон/A
Уильям/A
Улюнкка/A
Усинск/A
Ухтюк/A
Филипп/A
Хӗрпустан/A
Хатяк/A
Хунчар/A
Челябинск/A
Шалай/A
Шехерук/A
Эйлер/A
Элюш/A
Эрнук/A
Юрттӑм/A
Ялтаҫ/A
Ярмулла/A
Яхха/A
абразив/A
аванзал/A
авиамоделист/A
авсӑм/A
автокран/A
автор/A
автошкул/A
агроминимум/A
азиат/A
айкату/A
акай/A
аккумулятор/A
ал/A
алка/A
алтай/A
альтиметр/A
аммиак/A
анабиоз/A
анестезин/A
ансатлӑх/A
антисемитизм/A
аншлаг/A
апостол/A
аптраманлӑх/A
арготизм/A
аркка/A
артак/A
архипелаг/A
асӑх/A
асбошифер/A
астарулӑх/A
атеизм/A
аттӑк/A
ахӑрма/A
ачашлӑх/A
аяк/A
бал/A
бандит/A
баркас/A
баттерфляй/A
бензин/A
библиофил/A
бисквит/A
боксёр/A
бостон/A
брелок/A
брус/A
бульдозер/A
буфер/A
вӑйламас/A
вӑраткӑҫ/A
вӑтанулӑх/A
ваксал/A
варӑш/A
ватӑлӑх/A
велоспорт/A
вершук/A
вибратор/A
висмут/A
вокал/A
вулӑс/A
вутӑ/A
вырнаҫу/A
галун/A
гарпунёр/A
геморрой/A
гепатит/A
гигант/A
гипноз/A
гобоист/A
госплан/A
гранатомёт/A
гроссмейстер/A
гурман/A
дворник/A
деканат/A
демпинг/A
детонатор/A
диалектолог/A
диктатор/A
дирижёр/A
доброволец/A
документ/A
доцент/A
дуршлаг/A
жалобщик/A
жрец/A
заказ/A
заочнӑй/AE
заём/A
золотник/A
идеалист/A
изоморфизм/A
имажинизм/A
инвалидлӑх/A
инжир/A
интендант/A
информбюро/A
ихтиол/A
йӑлалӑх/A
йӑнӑш/HA
йӑран/A
йытӑ/A
кӑлай/A
кӑнттанис/A
кӑтра/A
кабачок/A
кайӑкҫӑ/A
калориметр/A
канавал/A
капанлӑх/A
карҫинкка/A
кардинал/A
картон/A
кастет/A
кахат/A
квартет/A
кинематографист/A
китай/A
кобальт/A
колосник/A
коммутатор/A
кондуктор/A
контрреволюционер/A
корпункт/A
кочегар/A
криминалист/A
кубрик/A
культурӑлӑх/A
куплет/A
курортник/A
кучер/A
лавҫӑ/A
ландыш/A
ларкка/A
лезгин/A
ликер/A
литфак/A
лунник/A
мӑйракасӑр/A
мӑртӑклӑх/A
магометан/A
маклака/A
манжет/A
мартен/A
матяк/A
мелинит/A
метод/A
миллиграмм/A
модерн/A
москит/A
мулсӑр/A
мушкет/A
наладчик/A
натурщик/A
неофашист/A
нухай/A
океанолог/A
опыт/A
ответлӑх/A
пӑлхавлӑх/A
пӑртманет/A
пӑшӑрханӑҫ/A
пакалчамас/A
палчас/A
папарняк/A
паркамас/A
пас/A
патша/A
пеленгатор/A
печник/A
питон/A
плед/A
подпуск/A
полк/A
посол/A
предлог/A
примус/A
продавец/A
протектор/A
пуҫана/A
пуласлӑх/A
пурак/A
путӑм/A
пылак/AE
радиозонд/A
район/A
рахитик/A
регбист/A
рекорд/A
ресурс/A
романист/A
сӑвӑрткӑҫ/A
сӑпӑ/AE
сӑхӑлӑх/A
сайхалӑх/A
самант/A
сапӑрлӑх/A
сарлакан/A
сверло/A
селекционер/A
сигнал/A
сифон/A
славянлану/A
совпартшкул/A
спаржа/A
стажер/A
стенографист/A
стрихнин/A
суйхӑсӑр/A
сунталҫӑ/A
сухӑр/A
сыпкӑм/A
тӑвӑрлӑх/A
тӑлпаланчӑк/A
тӑпка/A
тӑртанчӑк/A
тав/A
таккулӑх/A
тамак/A
таптав/A
тахат/A
телецентр/A
тиечук/A
топоним/A
транспортер/A
тропик/A
тулӑксӑрлӑх/A
тупӑлча/A
туратсӑр/A
тут/A
тыркас/A
уҫланкӑ/A
уйрӑм/AE
ултав/A
упус/A
усӑ/A
утруска/A
фаготист/A
фасон/A
фиксаж/A
фокстерьер/A
фотожурналист/A
фундук/A
хӑйра/HA
хӑпӑнчӑк/A
хӑтланкаларӑш/A
хавтан/A
халсӑрлӑх/A
хаса/A
хоккей/A
хул/A
хупкӑч/A
хурчка/A
хыҫал/A
хысма/A
циклон/A
чӑмӑртану/A
чӑтулӑх/A
чаплашка/A
чертеж/A
чухӑ/A
шӑматкун/A
шӑраҫ/A
шай/A
шанкр/A
шарф/A
шеллак/A
шовинизм/A
штеккер/A
шур/A
шыльӑк/A
ыраш/A
экран/A
электробур/A
энергетик/A
эстон/A
юмах/A
юравсӑр/A
юшкӑн/A
янавар/A
ясмак/A
